hu: Szempárna alakja: Kontúros; Szögletes; Egyéb
ja: アイピローの形: 輪郭; 長方形; その他
it: Forma del cuscino per gli occhi: Sagomata; Rettangolare; Altro
nb: Form på øyepute: Konturformet; Rektangulær; Annen
fr: Forme du coussin pour les yeux: Profilé; Rectangulaire; Autre
zh-CN: 眼枕形状: 轮廓; 矩形; 其他
en: Eye pillow shape: Contoured; Rectangular; Other
fi: Silmätyynyn muoto: Muotoiltu; Suorakulmainen; Muu
tr: Göz yastığı şekli: Konturlu; Dikdörtgen; Diğer
ko: 눈 베개 모양: 윤곽; 직사각형; 기타
ro-RO: Formă pernă pentru ochi: Conturată; Dreptunghiulară; Altele
zh-TW: 眼枕形狀: 輪廓; 長方形; 其他
sk-SK: Tvar vankúšika na oči: Tvarovaný; Obdĺžnikový; Iné
nl: Vorm oogkussen: Voorgevormd; Rechthoekig; Andere
vi: Kiểu dáng gối mắt: Hình dạng được định hình; Chữ nhật; Khác
da: Øjenpudeform: Kontureret; Rektangulær; Andet
th: รูปร่างของหมอนปิดตา: โค้งมน; แบบสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Akių pagalvėlės forma: Kontūrinė; Stačiakampė; Kita
pt-BR: Formato da almofada para os olhos: Contornado; Retangular; Outro
pl: Kształt poduszki na oczy: Wyprofilowane; Prostokątna; Pozostałe
hr-HR: Oblik jastučića za oči: Konturirani; Pravokutnik; Ostalo
de: Augenkissenform: Konturiert; Rechteckig; Sonstiges
es: Forma de almohada para los ojos: Contorneado; Rectangular; Otros
cs: Tvar polštářku na oči: Konturovaný; Obdélníkový; Jiné
el: Σχήμα σε μαξιλαράκι ματιού: Με περίγραμμα; Ορθογώνιο; Άλλο
bg-BG: Форма на възглавница за очи: Контурен; Правоъгълна; Други
ru: Форма подушечки для глаз: Контурный; Прямоугольник; Другой
pt-PT: Formato de almofada para os olhos: Contornado; Retangular; Outro
sl-SI: Oblika blazine za oči: Oblikovana; Pravokotna; Drugo
sv: Form på ögonkudde: Konturerad; Rektangulär; Annat